District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.06

Repealed

Continuing jurisdiction to enforce child-support order.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 206, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(2)(D), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
This section is referenced in § 46-302.02 and § 46-302.07.
1981 Ed., § 30-342.6.
D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 206 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).